Ohio, session 136, SB168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 3318.72 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 3318.72. (A) As used in this section : 6
(1) "Acquisition of classroom facilities" has the same 7
meaning as in section 3318.40 of the Revised Code. 8
(2) "Classroom facilities" has the same meaning as in 9
section 3318.01 of the Revised Code. 10
(3) "Preschool program" means a child care program 11
licensed under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code. 12
(B) The Ohio facilities construction commission shall 13
establish guidelines for assisting school district boards of 14
education in the acquisition of classroom facilities for a 15
preschool program. 16
(C) Upon receipt of a written proposal by the district 17
board, the commission shall provide funding to assist that 18

S. B. No. 168 Page 2
As Introduced
district board in the acquisition of classroom facilities. The 19
proposal of the district board shall be submitted in a form and 20
in the manner prescribed by the commission. The proposal shall 21
indicate both the total amount of funding requested from the 22
commission and the amount of other funding pledged for the 23
acquisition of the classroom facilities, the latter of which 24
shall not be less than the total amount of funding requested 25
from the commission. Once the commission determines a proposal 26
meets its established guidelines, the commission shall enter 27
into an agreement with the district board for the acquisition of 28
the classroom facilities and shall encumber, in accordance with 29
section 3318.11 of the Revised Code, the approved funding from 30
the amounts appropriated to the commission for classroom 31
facilities assistance projects. The agreement shall include a 32
stipulation of the ownership of the classroom facilities in the 33
event the preschool program permanently closes at any time. 34